Utah statutes.
48-3a-1007.   Alternative means of approval of transactions.

Except as otherwise provided in the organic law or organic rules of a domestic entity, approval of a transaction under this part by the unanimous vote or consent of its interest holders satisfies the requirements of this part for approval of the transaction.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

